Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Domestic Violence Councils

403.700.
Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault — Membership — Executive committee — Duties and responsibilities of council — Administrative and staff assistance. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 317, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 68, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 304, effective June 26, 2007; 2012, ch. 158, § 68, effective July 12, 2012; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

403.705.
Domestic violence coordinating councils — Membership — Purpose — Local protocol required — Domestic violence fatality review teams — Duties.

One (1) or more local domestic violence coordinating councils may be established in any jurisdiction or group of counties.

Membership on local domestic violence coordinating councils may include, but not be limited to, judges, Commonwealth’s and county attorneys, law enforcement officers, probation or parole officers, spouse abuse center staff, other victim advocates defined under KRS

421.570

, family service workers employed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, mental health professionals, health care professionals, educators, public advocates, and other persons as deemed appropriate.

The purpose of local domestic violence coordinating councils shall include, but not be limited to, the promotion of public awareness about domestic violence, the facilitation of interagency coordination, and the assessment of service delivery related to domestic violence.

Local domestic violence coordinating councils shall develop a local protocol consistent with nationally recognized practice.

Local domestic violence coordinating councils may, if authorized by the local coroner or a medical examiner, create a domestic violence fatality review team, the purpose of which shall be to prevent future deaths and injuries related to domestic violence.

Domestic violence fatality review teams of local domestic violence coordinating councils may:

Analyze information regarding local domestic violence fatalities to identify trends, patterns, and risk factors;

Evaluate the effectiveness of local prevention and intervention strategies; and

Recommend, to the appropriate state or local governmental agency , changes in the Kentucky Revised Statutes, administrative regulations, policies, budgets, and treatment and service standards that may facilitate the prevention of domestic violence fatalities. The fatality review team may establish a protocol for the investigation of domestic violence fatalities and may establish operating rules and procedures as it deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

The review of a case by a domestic violence fatality review team may include information from reports generated or received by agencies, organizations, or individuals responsible for investigation, prosecution, or treatment in the case.

The proceedings, records, opinions, and deliberations of the domestic violence fatality review team shall be privileged and shall not be subject to discovery, subpoena, or introduction into evidence in any civil action in any manner that would directly or indirectly identify specific persons or cases reviewed by the local team. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict or limit the right to discover or use in any civil action any evidence that is discoverable independent of the proceedings of the domestic violence fatality review team.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 317, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 626, effective June 20, 2005; 2017 ch. 80, § 51, effective June 29, 2017.

403.707.
Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee — Co-chairs — Membership — Duties.

The Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee is established.

The Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee shall be co-chaired by the executive director of the Kentucky Association of Sexual Assault Programs and the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police or the commissioner’s designee.

The membership of the Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee shall consist of the following:

The executive director of the Kentucky Board of Nursing or the executive director’s designee;

The executive director of the Kentucky Nurses Association or the executive director’s designee;

The executive director of the Kentucky Hospital Association or the executive director’s designee;

The executive director of the Kentucky Association of Children’s Advocacy Centers;

The director of the Department of Kentucky State Police Crime Lab;

The commissioner of the Department for Community Based Services or the commissioner’s designee;

The director of the Victims’ Advocacy Division of the Office of the Attorney General or the director’s designee;

A sexual assault nurse examiner appointed by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

A representative from a sexual assault response team appointed by the executive director of the Kentucky Association of Sexual Assault Programs;

A physician appointed by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; and

A Commonwealth’s attorney or an assistant Commonwealth’s attorney appointed by the Attorney General.

Members appointed under subsection (3)(h) to (k) of this section shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority and shall not serve longer than four (4) years without reappointment.

The Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee shall:

Serve in an advisory capacity to the Kentucky Board of Nursing in accomplishing the duties set forth under KRS

314.142

;

Serve in an advisory capacity to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet in the development of the statewide sexual assault protocol required under KRS 216B.400(4);

Develop a model protocol for the operation of sexual assault response teams which shall include the roles of sexual assault nurse examiners, physicians, law enforcement, prosecutors, and victim advocates;

Provide assistance to each regional rape crisis center, as designated by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, in establishing a regional sexual assault response team;

Develop model policies for law enforcement agencies related to handling sexual assault examination kits and investigating sexual assaults with a victim-centered, evidence-based approach;

By January 1, 2018, report to the General Assembly on the results of the analysis of previously untested sexual assault examination kits submitted to the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory pursuant to 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 58, sec. 1, including whether analysis of those kits led to the identification and prosecution of suspects and the cost to society of the offenses committed by the suspects identified;

By July 1, 2018, and by each July 1 thereafter, report to the General Assembly and to the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet on the number of sexual assaults reported, the number of sexual assault examination kits submitted to the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory, the number of kits tested, and the number of charges filed and convictions obtained in sexual assault cases in the previous calendar year;

Provide information and recommendations concerning the activities of the agency or organization represented by each individual committee member as related to sexual assault issues and programs within the purview of the agency or organization; and

Recommend to the appropriate state agency any changes in statute, administrative regulation, training, policy, and budget to promote a multidisciplinary response to sexual assault.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 20, § 4, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 99, § 69, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 305, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 101, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 158, § 69, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 58, § 5, effective April 8, 2016; 2017 ch. 80, § 52, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/8/2016). 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 58, sec. 11 provided that that Act shall be known as the Sexual Assault Forensic Evidence (SAFE) Act of 2016. This statute was amended in Section 5 of that Act.